Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-101
Act, how cited.

Sections 86-101 to 86-166 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Telecommunications Regulation Act.

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 2;

Laws 2003, LB 2, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB181, § 1;

Laws 2010, LB183, § 1;

Laws 2012, LB715, § 1;

Laws 2019, LB462, § 17;

Laws 2020, LB996, § 2.